Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB534.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1303.1. Absentee Ballots for Electors Who are Blind, Visually Impaired or Disabled.--(a) An elector who is blind, visually impaired or disabled may request a special absentee ballot available in braille.12345678910111213141516171819202122 (b) A request for a special absentee ballot under subsection (a) shall be made in writing to the county board of elections where the elector is registered at least forty-five (45) days prior to the election for which the elector is requesting the special absentee ballot. The request shall be valid for all elections held during the calendar year in which the request was received and in which the applicant is eligible to vote. An applicant shall file the appropriate absentee ballot application as required under section 1302 for each election in which they apply for a special absentee ballot.(c) The Department of State shall prepare and provide the appropriate form to request a special absentee ballot, which shall be available at county boards of elections and upon request from the Department of State. An applicant may also choose to submit a request in writing without using the form provided if the communication contains all of the following information:(1) The name and registered address of the qualified elector.(2) A daytime telephone number.(3) The elector's political party affiliation, if the request for a special absentee ballot is also for a primary election.(4) An indication that the elector requests a braille absentee ballot.(d) All requests received by county boards of elections shall be processed and forwarded to the Department of State within twenty-four hours of receipt. A county board shall maintain a list of all individuals requesting special absentee ballots and shall forward a copy of the list to the Department 20250HB0534PN0527 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of State at least eighteen (18) days before the date of an election.(e) The Department of State shall be responsible for the preparation and distribution of special absentee ballots. When possible, the Department of State shall prepare the special absentee ballot so that the voted ballot can be read by the tabulation equipment rather than being manually reproduced by election officials onto a machine-readable ballot.(f) The Department of State may promulgate rules and regulations:(1) For the procedure for the manual reproduction of voted ballots, when necessary, and the tabulation of special absentee ballots.(2) Providing the procedure for the preparation and distribution of special absentee ballots.(g) The Department of State shall prepare and publish a guide describing the manner in which a special absentee ballot can be voted. The guide shall be available in print, braille, audio or other accessible formats.(h) The Department of State shall expand the special absentee ballot service to other electors with disabilities, as feasible, as determined by the Secretary of the Commonwealth, and incorporate other accessible formats as technology and resources allow.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0534PN0527 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425